Tennessee, session 114, SB0138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-165, is amended by inserting
the following as a new subsection (b) and redesignating the existing subsection (b) and all
subsequent subsections accordingly:
(b) The bureau of TennCare shall reimburse a public or private air ambulance
service that bills for transports and has a base of operations in this state that provides a
covered emergency or nonemergency service to a TennCare recipient at a rate not less
than sixty-seven and one-half percent (67.5%) of the federal medicare program's
allowable charge for participating providers.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to reimbursement for transports that occur on or after the effective date of this act.
SB0138
001327
- 1 -